North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 4B. Uniform Clerks of Superior Court Retirement Act of 1975. [Repealed]

§§ 135-84 through 135-86.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983 (Regular Session, 1984), c. 1031, s. 24.

Cross References.

For the Consolidated Judicial Retirement Act, see now

G.S. 135-50

et seq.

§§ 135-87 through 135-89.

Reserved for future codification purposes.